Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1503
Manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor; failure to furnish or make payment; liability; damages.

In the event that any manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor of farm machinery, farm implements, and repair parts for farm machinery and farm implements, or of repair parts therefor, upon cancellation of a contract by either a retailer or a manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor, fails or refuses to make payment to such dealer as required by section 69-1501, or refuses to supply farm machinery, farm implements, and repair parts for farm machinery and farm implements, or repair parts therefor, to any retailer of such products who may have a retail sales contract with such manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor dated after July 1, 1971, but before May 2, 1991, which has an expiration date, such manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor shall be liable in a civil action to be brought by such retailer for one hundred percent of the net cost of such farm implements, machinery, and attachments, plus transportation charges which have been paid by the retailer and eighty-five percent of the current net price of repair parts, plus five percent for handling, packing, and loading plus freight charges which have been paid by the retailer.

Laws 1971, LB 699, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 123, § 13.